hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videólejátszók és -felvevők: DVD- és Blu-ray-lejátszók; DVD- és Blu-ray-felvevők; DVD és VCR kombinált lejátszók; DVD és VHS kombinált felvevők; Digitális videórögzítők; LaserDisc-lejátszók; Hálózati videórögzítők; Streaming és otthoni médialejátszók; VCR-ek
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo grotuvai ir įrašymo įrenginiai: DVD ir „Blu-ray“ grotuvai; DVD ir „Blu-ray“ įrašymo įrenginiai; DVD ir VCR kombinuoti grotuvai; DVD ir VHS kombinuoti įrašymo įrenginiai; Skaitmeniniai vaizdo įrašymo įrenginiai; Lazerinių diskų grotuvai; Tinklo vaizdo įrašymo įrenginiai; Srautinio perdavimo ir namų medijos grotuvai; Vaizdo grotuvai
de: Elektronik > Video > Videoabspielgeräte & -rekorder: DVD- & Blu-ray-Player; DVD- und Blu-ray-Recorder; DVD-/VHS-Kombiplayer; DVD- und VHS-Kombirekorder; Digitale Videorekorder; LaserDisc-Player; Netzwerk-Videorekorder; Netzwerk-Mediaplayer; Videorekorder
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 视频播放与录制设备: DVD 和蓝光播放器; DVD 和蓝光录像机; DVD 与 VCR 组合播放器; DVD 与 VHS 组合录像机; 数字录像机; 激光影碟播放器; 网络录像机; 家庭媒体播放器; VCR/录像机
nl: Elektronica > Video > Videospelers en -recorders: Dvd-spelers en blu ray-spelers; Dvd-recorders en blu-ray-recorders; Dvd- en vcr-combispelers; Dvd  en vhs combirecorders; Digitale videorecorders; Laserdisc spelers; Netwerk-videorecorders; Streaming en home-mediaspelers; Videorecorders
sv: Elektronik > Video > Videospelare och videoinspelningsutrustning: DVD- och Blu-ray-spelare; DVD- och Bluray-inspelare; DVD- och VCR-kombispelare; DVD- och VHS-kombispelare; Digitalvideoinspelare; LaserDisc-spelare; Nätverksvideoinspelare; Mediaspelare för hemmet; Videobandspelare
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Lecteurs et enregistreurs vidéo: Lecteurs DVD et Blu-ray; Enregistreurs DVD et Blu-ray; Lecteurs combinés DVD/VHS; Enregistreurs combinés DVD/VHS; Enregistreurs vidéonumériques; Lecteurs LaserDisc; Enregistreurs vidéo en réseau; Lecteurs multimédia en continu; Magnétoscopes
en: Electronics > Video > Video Players & Recorders: DVD & Blu-ray Players; DVD & Blu-ray Recorders; DVD & VCR Combo Players; DVD & VHS Combo Recorders; Digital Video Recorders; LaserDisc Players; Network Video Recorders; Streaming & Home Media Players; VCRs
cs: Elektronika > Video > Videopřehrávače a rekordéry: Přehrávače DVD; DVD a Blu-ray rekordéry; Kombinované DVD a VCR přehrávače; Kombinované DVD a VHS rekordéry; Rekordéry digitálního videa; LaserDisc přehrávače; Síťové video rekordéry; Streamování a domácí přehrávače médií; Videorekordéry
es: Electrónica > Video > Grabadores y reproductores de vídeo: Reproductores DVD y Blu-ray; Grabadoras de DVD y Blu-ray; Reproductores combinados de DVD y VCR; Grabadores combinados de DVD y VHS; Grabadores de vídeo digitales; Reproductores LaserDisc; Grabadores de video de red; Reproductores multimedia domésticos y de streaming; Videograbadoras
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής και εγγραφής βίντεο: Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής DVD & Blu-ray; Συσκευές εγγραφής DVD & Blu-ray; Συνδυαστικές συσκευές αναπαραγωγής DVD & VCR; Συνδυαστικές συσκευές εγγραφής DVD & VHS; Ψηφιακές συσκευές εγγραφής βίντεο; Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής LaserDisc; Συσκευές εγγραφής δικτυακού βίντεο; Συσκευές ροής & αναπαραγωγής οικιακών πολυμέσων; VCRs
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Aparate de redare și de înregistrare video: Playere DVD și Blu-ray; Aparate de înregistrat DVD și Blu-ray; Playere combo DVD și VCR; Înregistratoare combinate DVD și VHS; Aparate digitale de înregistrare video; Playere LaserDisc; Înregistratoare video de rețea; Streaming și playere media; Aparate de redare și înregistrare casete video
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 錄放影機: DVD 和藍光播放器; DVD 和藍光燒錄機; DVD 及 VCR 組合播放機; DVD 及 VHS 組合錄像機; 數位視訊錄影機; 鐳射影碟播放機; 網路影片錄像機; 串流/家用媒體播放器; VCR 錄影機
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videonauhurit: DVD- ja Blu-ray-soittimet; DVD- ja Blu-ray-tallentimet; DVD- ja VCR-yhdistelmäsoitin; DVD- ja VHS-yhdistelmänauhuri; Digitaaliset mediatallentimet; LaserDisc-soitin; Verkkovideonauhuri; Striimaus ja kodin mediasoittimet; VHS-nauhurit
da: Elektronik > Video > Videoafspillere og -optagere: Dvd- og Blu-Ray-afspillere; Dvd- og Blu-Ray-optagere; Kombinerede DVD-/videoafspillere; DVD-/VHS-kombinationsoptagere; Digitale videooptagere; LaserDisc-afspillere; Netværksvideooptagere; Hjemmebiografafspillere; Videobåndoptagere
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Videospillere og -opptakere: DVD- og Blu-ray-spillere; DVD- og Blu-ray-opptakere; DVD- og VCR-kombospillere; DVD- og VHS-komboopptakere; Digitale videoopptakere; LaserDisc-spillere; Nettverksvideoopptakere; Strømme- og hjemmemediaspillere; Videospillere
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > 録画・再生機器: DVD・ブルーレイプレーヤー; DVD・Blu-rayレコーダー; DVD・VHS一体型プレーヤー; DVD・VHSコンボレコーダー; デジタルビデオレコーダー; レーザーディスクプレーヤー; ネットワークビデオレコーダー; メディアストリーミング端末; ビデオデッキ
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Đầu ghi và phát video: Đầu Blu-ray và DVD; Đầu ghi DVD & Blu-ray; Máy phát DVD và VCR kết hợp; Bộ ghi DVD và VHS kết hợp; Đầu ghi video kỹ thuật số; Máy phát LaserDisc; Bộ ghi hình video mạng; Đầu phát nội dung cho gia đình; Đầu máy video
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Gravadores e players de vídeo: Reprodutores de DVD e Blu-Ray; Gravadores de DVD e Blu-Ray; Tocadores combo DVD e VCR; Gravadores combo DVD e VHS; Gravadores de vídeo digitais; Tocadores de LaserDisc; Gravadores de vídeo em rede; Reprodutores multimídia e dispositivos de streaming; VRS
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Video playeri i rekorderi: DVD i Blu-ray playeri; DVD i Blu-ray rekorderi; DVD i VCR kombinirana reprodukcija; DVD i VHS komibinirani snimači; Digitalni videorekorderi; Uređaji za reprodukciju LaserDisc; Mrežni videosnimači; Streaming i kućni media playeri; VHS videorekorderi
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Leitores e gravadores de vídeo: Leitores de DVD e Blu-ray; Gravadores de DVD e Blu-ray; Leitores combinados DVD e VCR; Gravadores combinados DVD e VHS; Gravadores de vídeo digital; Leitores laserdisc; Gravadores de vídeo em rede; Leitores multimédia de transmissão e domésticos; VCR
tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Oynatıcılar ve Kaydediciler: DVD ve Blu-ray Oynatıcılar; DVD ve Blu-ray Kaydediciler; DVD ve VCR Kombine Oynatıcıları; DVD ve VHS Kombine Kayıt Cihazları; Dijital Video Kaydediciler; LaserDisc Oynatıcıları; Ağ Video Kayıt Cihazları; Akış ve Ev Medya Oynatıcıları; Video Kaset Kaydediciler
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 비디오 플레이어/녹화기: DVD/블루레이 플레이어; DVD/블루레이 녹화기; DVD 및 VCR 콤보 플레이어; DVD 및 VHS 콤보 레코더; 디지털 비디오 녹화기; 레이저디스크 플레이어; 네트워크 비디오 레코더; 스트리밍/가정용 미디어 플레이어; VCR
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Устройства для воспроизведения и записи видео: Проигрыватели дисков DVD и Blu-ray; Устройства записи дисков DVD и Blu-ray; Комбинированные плееры DVD и VCR; Комбинированные рекордеры DVD и VHS; Цифровые видеорекордеры; Проигрыватели LaserDisc; Сетевые видеорегистраторы; Сетевые медиаплееры; Видеомагнитофоны
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Устройства за възпроизвеждане и запис на видео: DVD и Blu-ray устройства; DVD и Blu-ray записващи устройства; Комбинирани DVD и VCR плейъри; Комбинирани DVD и VHS рекордери; Дигитални записващи устройства (DVR); LaserDisc плейъри; Мрежови видеорекордери; Мултимедийни плеъри; Видеомагнетофони
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > เครื่องเล่นและบันทึกวิดีโอ: เครื่องเล่น DVD และบลูเรย์; เครื่องบันทึก DVD และบลูเรย์; เครื่องเล่น DVD และวีซีอาร์; เครื่องบันทึก DVD และวีเอชเอส; เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอแบบดิจิทัล; เครื่องเล่นเลเซอร์ดิสก์; เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอเครือข่าย NVR; การสตรีมและเครื่องเล่นสื่อที่บ้าน; VCR
pl: Elektronika > Video > Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki wideo: Odtwarzacze DVD i Blu-ray; Nagrywarki DVD i Blu-ray; Odtwarzacze combo DVD i VCR; Rejestratory combo DVD i VHS; Rejestratory cyfrowe DVR; Odtwarzacze LaserDisc; Rejestrator wideo sieciowy; Domowe centra multimedialne; Odtwarzacze wideo
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Video predvajalniki in snemalniki: Predvajalniki DVD-jev in Blu-ray predvajalniki; Snemalniki DVD in Blu-ray snemalniki; Kombinirani DVD in videokasetofoni; Kombinirani DVD in VHS snemalniki; Digitalni video snemalniki; LaserDisc predvajalniki; Omrežni video snemalniki; Pretočni in domači medijski predvajalniki; Videorekorderji
it: Elettronica > Video > Videoriproduttori/registratori: Lettori DVD e Blu-ray; Registratori DVD e Blu-ray; Lettori combo DVD e VCR; Registratori combo DVD e VHS; Registratori video digitali; Lettori LaserDisc; Videoregistratori di rete; Lettori multimediali e di streaming; VCR
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Video prehrávače a rekordéry: DVD a Blu-ray prehrávače; DVD a Blu-ray rekordéry; Kombinované DVD a VCR prehrávače; Kombinované DVD a VHS rekordéry; Digitálne videorekordéry; LaserDisc prehrávače; Sieťové videorekordéry; Streamovacie a domáce prehrávače médií; Videorekordéry